Utah statutes.
76-8-1401.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Chief administrator" means the principal of a school or the chief administrator of a school that does not have a principal, and includes the administrator's designee or representative.

(2)  "School" means an elementary school or a secondary school that:

(a)  is a public or private school; and

(b)  provides instruction for one or more of the grades kindergarten through 12.



Enacted by Chapter 107, 2004 General Session

